District of Columbia statutes.
1-327.72

Replacement fee.

A nonrefundable fee of $5 for replacement of any DC One Card that contains an electronic chip shall be collected by the agency issuing the replacement card at the point of issuance of the replacement card.

Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 1003, 57 DCR 181

History

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1003 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1003 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).

Emergency Legislation